Louisiana, session 2026, HB432.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:101.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§101.2. Population data; incarcerated individuals
A.(1) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, within six months
of August 1, 2026, shall collect and maintain an electronic record of information for
every incarcerated individual who has been committed to the custody of the
department. This information shall include but not be limited to all of the following:
(a) The last known residential address of the individual before his
incarceration.
(b) The race of the individual.
(c) Whether the individual is of Hispanic or Latino origin.
(d) Whether the individual is eighteen years of age or older.
(2) The department shall permit an incarcerated individual to update his last
known residential address, as practicable.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1136 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 432
B. No later than May first in any year when the federal decennial census is
taken but where the United States Census Bureau allocates incarcerated individuals
as residents of correctional facilities, the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections shall report all of the following information to the secretary of state:
(1) A unique identifier, not to include the name or state offender
identification number, for each incarcerated individual subject to the jurisdiction of
the department on the date when the decennial census reports a population range.
The unique identifier shall enable the secretary of state to address the department
with inquiries about specific address records while prohibiting anyone outside of the
department from identifying the incarcerated individual associated with the address
record.
(2) The street address of the correctional facility where the individual was
incarcerated at the time of the census.
(3) The last known address or other legal residence, if known, of the
individual prior to incarceration.
(4) The race of the individual.
(5) Whether the individual is of Hispanic or Latino origin.
(6) Whether the individual is eighteen years of age or older.
(7) Any additional information that the secretary of state may request
pursuant to this Title.
C. The secretary of state shall request from each agency that operates a
federal facility in this state that incarcerates individuals convicted of criminal
offenses a report that includes the information specified in Subsection B of this
Section.
D. The secretary of state shall collect and prepare redistricting population
data, as provided in Subsection E of this Section, to reflect each incarcerated
individual at his last known residential address. The data shall be the basis of the
senatorial districts provided in R.S. 24:35.1, the representative districts provided in
R.S. 24:35.3, and all local government districts that are based on population.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1136 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 432
Populations of incarcerated individuals who are residing at unknown geographic
locations within the state shall not be used to determine the ideal population of any
set of districts, wards, or precincts.
E.(1) The secretary of state shall determine the geographic units where
population counts in the federal decennial census contain both the facility of
incarceration and the legal residence of each incarcerated individual who is included
in the report required by this Section.
(2) The secretary of state shall do all of the following if the legal residence
of any incarcerated individual is both known and located in this state:
(a) Ensure that the individual is not represented in any population counts for
geographic units that include the facility where the individual was incarcerated,
unless that geographic unit also includes the legal residence of the individual.
(b) Ensure that any population counts reflect the last known residential
address of the individual.
(3) The secretary of state shall do all of the following if the legal residence
of any incarcerated individual is unknown or not located in this state and if any
individuals reported in the census reside in a federal correctional facility:
(a) Ensure that the individual is not represented in any population counts for
the geographic units that include the facility where the individual was incarcerated.
(b) Allocate the individual to a state unit that is not tied to a specific
determined geography.
(4) The data collected pursuant to this Subsection shall be published no later
than thirty days from the date that federal decennial redistricting data is published
for the state.
(5) The secretary of state shall notify local governments to use the data
collected pursuant to this Subsection for redistricting purposes.
F. The data collected pursuant to Subsection E of this Section shall not be
used in the distribution of any state or federal aid.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1136 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 432
Section 2. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.